Utah statutes.
58-64-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule. The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal, the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of having performed not less than 25 deception detection examinations during the two years immediately preceding the date of the renewal notice.

(3)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

